Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5706.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 629e. (1) Before October 1, 2003, in addition to any fine or cost ordered to be paid under this act, and in addition to any assessment levied under section 907, the judge or district court magistrate shall levy a highway safety assessment of $5.00, a jail reimbursement program assessment of $5.00, and a secondary road patrol and training assessment of $10.00 for each civil infraction determination except for a parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs imposed are $10.00 or less. Upon payment of the assessments, the clerk of the court shall transmit the assessments levied to the department of treasury. Until October 1, 2003, the state treasurer shall deposit the revenue received pursuant to under this subsection in the highway safety fund, in the jail reimbursement program fund, and in the secondary road patrol and training fund, and shall report annually to the legislature all revenues received and disbursed under this section. An assessment levied under this subsection shall is not be considered a civil fine for purposes of section 909. (2) A highway safety fund, a jail reimbursement program fund, and a secondary road patrol and training fund are created in the department of treasury. The highway safety fund and the secondary road patrol and training fund shall must be administered by the department of state police. The jail reimbursement program fund shall must be administered by the department of corrections. Until October 1, 2003, money collected under subsection (1) shall must be deposited in the respective funds as provided in subsection (1). Beginning October 1, 2003, money collected under subsection (1) shall must be deposited in the justice system fund created in section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.181. Money remaining in the respective funds at the end of a fiscal year shall does not lapse to the general fund, but shall remain remains in the respective funds for use for the purposes of the respective funds. The money deposited in the highway safety fund shall serve serves as a supplement to, and not as a replacement for, the funds money budgeted for the department of state police. The money in the highway safety fund shall must be used by the department of state police for the employment of additional state police enlisted personnel to enforce the traffic laws on the highways and freeways of this state and for reimbursements under the Michigan state police patrolling accountability: you shoulder the cost act. The money in the jail reimbursement program fund shall must be used by the department of corrections to reimburse counties for housing and custody of convicted felons pursuant to under the requirements of section 35 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.35. The money in the secondary road patrol and training fund shall must be used for secondary road patrol and traffic accident prevention grants pursuant to under section 77 of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.77, and for grants under section 14 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.614. The department of state police and the department of corrections shall report annually to the legislature all revenues received and disbursed under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06446'26) or House Bill No. 5705 (request no. H06446'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.